en: Highlighters & Luminizers
xx: Highlighters & Luminizers
cs: Rozjasňovače
da: Highlightere og luminizere
de: Highlighter & Luminizer
es: Resaltadores e iluminadores
fr: Surligneurs et luminizers
it: Highlighter e illuminanti per il viso
ja: ハイライト・ルミナイザー
nl: Highlighters en luminizers
no: Fremhevere og luminizere
pl: Rozświetlacze do twarzy
pt: Iluminadores
ru: Хайлайтеры и люминайзеры
sv: Highlighters och luminizers
tr: Vurgulayıcılar ve Aydınlatıcılar

en: Lip Makeup
xx: Lip Makeup
cs: Make-up na rty
da: Læbemakeup
de: Lippen
es: Maquillaje de labios
fr: Maquillage pour les lèvres
it: Trucco labbra
ja: リップメイク
nl: Lipmake-up
no: Leppesminke
pl: Makijaż ust
pt: Maquiagem para os lábios
ru: Косметика для губ
sv: Läppmakeup
tr: Dudak Makyajı

en: Lip & Cheek Stains
xx: Lip & Cheek Stains
cs: Lesky na rty a tváře
da: Farve til læber og kind
de: Lippen- & Wangentönung
es: Colores de labios y mejillas
fr: Teintes pour lèvres et joues
it: Tinte per labbra e guance
ja: リップステイン
nl: Make-up voor lippen en wangen
no: Leppe- og kinnfarge
pl: Pomadki w pisaku i róże w sztyfcie
pt: Corantes para bochecha e lábios
ru: Оттенки для губ и щек
sv: Produkter för läppar och kinder
tr: Likit Ruj ve Yanak Renklendirici

en: Lip Gloss
xx: Lip Gloss
cs: Lesky na rty
da: Lip gloss
de: Lipgloss
es: Brillo labial
fr: Brillant à lèvres
it: Lucidalabbra
ja: リップグロス
nl: Lipgloss
no: Lipgloss
pl: Błyszczyki do ust
pt: Brilhos labiais
ru: Блески для губ
sv: Läppglans
tr: Dudak Parlatıcısı

en: Lip Liner
xx: Lip Liner
cs: Konturovací tužky na rty
da: Læbeblyant
de: Lipliner
es: Perfilador de labios
fr: Crayon à lèvres
it: Matite per labbra
ja: リップライナー
nl: Lipliner
no: Lip liner
pl: Konturówki do ust
pt: Delineador labial
ru: Контурные карандаши для губ
sv: Läppenna
tr: Dudak Kalemi

en: Lip Primer
xx: Lip Primer
cs: Podkladové báze na rty
da: Læbeprimer
de: Lippenstift-Grundierung
es: Base fijadora para labios
fr: Apprêts pour les lèvres
it: Primer per le labbra
ja: リップ下地
nl: Lipprimer
no: Leppeprimer
pl: Bazy pod szminkę
pt: Primers labiais
ru: Основа для помады
sv: Primer för läpparna
tr: Ruj Astarı

en: Lipstick
xx: Lipstick
cs: Rtěnky
da: Læbestift
de: Lippenstift
es: Lápiz labial
fr: Rouge à lèvres
it: Rossetto
ja: 口紅
nl: Lipstick
no: Leppestift
pl: Pomadki do ust
pt: Batons
ru: Губная помада
sv: Läppstift
tr: Ruj

en: Makeup Finishing Sprays
xx: Makeup Finishing Sprays
cs: Fixátory make-upu
da: Makeup sprays
de: Spray zum Fixieren von Make-up
es: Esprays fijadores de maquillaje
fr: Sprays de finition de maquillage
it: Spray di finitura trucco
ja: メイク仕上げスプレー
nl: Afwerkingsprays voor make-up
no: Overflatespray
pl: Utrwalacze makijażu w sprayu
pt: Sprays de acabamento para maquiagem
ru: Завершающий спрей
sv: Fixerande makeupsprayer
tr: Makyaj Tamamlama Spreyleri

en: Temporary Tattoos
xx: Temporary Tattoos
cs: Odstranitelná tetování
da: Midlertidige tatoveringer
de: Temporäre Tattoos
es: Tatuajes no permanentes
fr: Tatouages temporaires
it: Tatuaggi temporanei
ja: タトゥーシール
nl: Tijdelijke tatoeages
no: Midlertidige tatoveringer
pl: Sztuczne tatuaże
pt: Tatuagens temporárias
ru: Смываемые татуировки
sv: Temporära tatueringar
tr: Geçici Dövmeler

en: Nail Care
xx: Nail Care
cs: Péče o nehty
da: Neglepleje
de: Nagelpflege
es: Cuidado de uñas
fr: Soin des ongles
it: Cura delle unghie
ja: ネイルケア
nl: Nagelverzorging
no: Neglepleie
pl: Pielęgnacja paznokci
pt: Cuidados com as unhas
ru: Средства для ухода за ногтями
sv: Nagelvård
tr: Tırnak Bakımı

en: Cuticle Cream & Oil
xx: Cuticle Cream & Oil
cs: Krémy a oleje na nehtovou kůžičku
da: Creme og olie til neglebånd
de: Nagelhautcremes & -Lotionen
es: Aceites y cremas para cutículas
fr: Crèmes et huiles pour cuticules
it: Oli e creme per cuticole
ja: キューティクルオイル・クリーム
nl: Nagelriemcrème en -olie
no: Neglekrem og negleolje
pl: Kremy i olejki do skórek
pt: Cremes e óleos para cutículas
ru: Кремы и масла для кутикулы
sv: Nagelbandskräm och olja
tr: Kütikül Krem ve Yağı

en: False Nails
xx: False Nails
cs: Umělé nehty
da: Falske negle
de: Künstliche Nägel
es: Uñas postizas
fr: Faux-ongles
it: Unghie finte
ja: ネイルチップ
nl: Valse nagels
no: Falske negler
pl: Tipsy
pt: Unhas postiças
ru: Накладные ногти
sv: Lösnaglar
tr: Takma Tırnaklar

en: Manicure Glue
xx: Manicure Glue
cs: Lepidla na nehty
da: Neglelim
de: Nagelkleber
es: Pegamento para uñas
fr: Colle pour faux ongles
it: Colla per unghie
ja: ネイル用接着剤
nl: Nagellijm
no: Neglelim
pl: Kleje do tipsów
pt: Cola para unhas
ru: Клеи для ногтей
sv: Nagellim
tr: Tırnak Yapıştırıcısı

en: Nail Art Kits & Accessories
xx: Nail Art Kits & Accessories
cs: Sady a příslušenství pro modeláž nehtů
da: Nail Art Kit og tilbehør
de: Nagelkunst-Zubehör
es: Kits y accesorios de decoración de uñas
fr: Kits et accessoires pour la décoration d'ongles
it: Kit artistici per unghie e accessori
ja: ネイルアートキット・関連用品
nl: Nagelversieringssets en -accessoires
no: Sett og tilbehør for negledesign
pl: Ozdoby do paznokci
pt: Kits e acessórios de Nail Art
ru: Наборы и принадлежности для нейл-арта
sv: Nagelkonstkit och tillbehör
tr: Tırnak Süsleme Set ve Aksesuarları

en: Nail Polish Drying Drops & Sprays
xx: Nail Polish Drying Drops & Sprays
cs: Urychlovače schnutí laku na nehty
da: Spray og dråber til tørring af neglelak
de: Nagellack-Überlacke und -Trockensprays
es: Aerosoles y gotas de secado para esmaltes de uñas
fr: Accélérateurs de séchage
it: Spray e gocce asciugasmalto
ja: マニキュア速乾剤・速乾スプレー
nl: Droogdruppels en -sprays voor nagellak
no: Spray og dråper til tørking av neglelakk
pl: Krople i spraye przyspieszające schnięcie lakieru do paznokci
pt: Gotas e sprays secantes para as unhas
ru: Капли и спреи для сушки лака для ногтей
sv: Torkdroppar och torkspray till nagellack
tr: Oje Kurutma Damlaları ve Spreyleri

en: Nail Polish Removers
xx: Nail Polish Removers
cs: Odlakovače
da: Neglelakfjernere
de: Nagellackentferner
es: Quitaesmaltes
fr: Dissolvants pour vernis à ongles
it: Solventi unghie
ja: 除光液
nl: Nagellakremovers
no: Neglelakkfjerner
pl: Zmywacze do paznokci
pt: Removedores de esmalte
ru: Средства для снятия лака
sv: Nagellacksborttagare
tr: Oje Çıkarıcılar

en: Nail Polish Thinners
xx: Nail Polish Thinners
cs: Ředidla laků na nehty
da: Fortyndere til neglelak
de: Nagellackverdünner
es: Disolventes para esmaltes de uñas
fr: Diluants à vernis
it: Solventi per unghie
ja: マニキュアうすめ液
nl: Nagellakverdunners
no: Neglelakktynner
pl: Rozcieńczalniki lakieru do paznokci
pt: Diluente para esmalte
ru: Разбавители для лака для ногтей
sv: Förtunningsmedel för nagellack
tr: Oje İncelticiler

en: Nail Polishes
xx: Nail Polishes
cs: Laky na nehty
da: Neglelak
de: Nagellacke
es: Esmaltes de uñas
fr: Vernis à ongles
it: Smalti per unghie
ja: マニキュア
nl: Nagellakken
no: Neglelakk
pl: Lakiery do paznokci
pt: Esmaltes
ru: Лаки для ногтей
sv: Nagellack
tr: Ojeler

en: Perfume & Cologne
xx: Perfume & Cologne
cs: Parfémy a kolínské vody
da: Parfume og eau de cologne
de: Düfte
es: Perfumes y colonias
fr: Parfums et eaux de Cologne
it: Profumi e colonie
ja: 香水・オーデコロン
nl: Parfum
no: Parfyme for han og henne
pl: Perfumy i wody kolońskie
pt: Perfume e colônia
ru: Парфюмерия
sv: Parfym och cologne
tr: Parfüm ve Kolonya

en: Skin Care
xx: Skin Care
cs: Péče o pleť
da: Hudpleje
de: Hautpflege
es: Cuidado de la piel
fr: Soin de la peau
it: Cura della pelle
ja: スキンケア
nl: Huidverzorging
no: Hudpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja skóry
pt: Cuidados com a pele
ru: Средства для ухода за кожей
sv: Hudvård
tr: Cilt Bakımı